Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 11-103.6, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 264, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 11-103.6), is amended to read as follows:
Section 11-103.6. A. 1. The State Board of Education shall
adopt subject matter standards for instruction of students in the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

publ ic schools of this state that are necessary to ensure there is
attainment of desired levels of competencies in a variety of areas
to include language, mathematics, science, social studies,
communication, and health and physical education.
2. School districts shall develop and implement curriculum,
courses, and instruction in order to ensure that students meet the
skills and competencies as set forth in this section and in the
subject matter standards adopted by the State Board of Education.
3. All students shall gain literacy at the elementary and
secondary levels. Students shall develop skills in reading,
writing, speaking, computing, and critical thinking. For purposes
of this section, critical thinking means a manner of analytical
thinking which is logical and uses linear factual analysis to reach
a conclusion. They shall learn about cultures and environments -
their own and those of others with whom they share the earth. All
students shall receive the instruction needed to lead healthy and
physically active lifestyles. Students, therefore, shall study
social studies, literature, languages, the arts, health,
mathematics, and science. Such curricula shall provide for the
teaching of a hands-on career exploration program in cooperation
with technology center schools.
4. The subject matter standards shall be designed to teach the
competencies for which students shall be tested as provided in
Section 1210.508 of this title, and shall be designed to prepare all
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

stud ents for active citizenship, employment and/or, and successful
completion of postsecondary education without the need for remedial
coursework at the postsecondary level.
5. The subject matter standards shall be designed with rigor as
defined in paragraph 3 6 of subsection G N of this section.
6. The subject matter standards for English Language Arts shall
give Classic Literature and nonfiction literature equal
consideration to other literature. In addition, emphasis shall be
given to the study of complete works of literature.
7. At a minimum, the subject matter standards for mathematics
shall require mastery of the standard algorithms in mathematics,
which is the most logical, efficient way of solving a problem that
consistently works, and for students to attain fluency in Euclidian
Euclidean geometry.
8. The subject matter standards for history, social studies,
and United States Government shall include study of important
historical documents, including the United States Constitution,
Declaration of Independence, Emancipation Proclamation, Federalist
Papers and other documents with significant history and heritage of
the United States, and the content of the United States
naturalization test, with an emphasis on the specific content of the
test and the ideas and concepts it references. Beginning with the
2022-2023 school year, the United States naturalization test shall
be administered in accordance with subsection F M of this section.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

9. The subject matter standards for United States Government
shall include an emphasis on civics, the structure and relationship
between the national, state, county, and local governments and
simulations of the democratic process. For the purposes of this
section, “civics” means the study of the rights and duties of
Oklahoma and United States citizens and of how those governments
work.
10. The subject matter standards for health and physical
education shall include, but not be limited to, the domains of
physical, emotional, social, and intellectual health. Health
literacy shall include the ability to obtain, process, and
understand basic health information and services needed to make
appropriate health decisions. Health shall also include the
importance of proper nutrition and exercise, mental health and
wellness, substance abuse, coping skills for understanding and
managing trauma, establishing and maintaining positive
relationships, and responsible decision making. Physical health
literacy shall include the ability to move with competence and
confidence in a wide variety of physical activities in multiple
environments that benefit the healthy development of the whole
person.
B. Subject to the provisions of subsection C or D of this
section, in order to graduate from a public high school accredited
by the State Board of Education with a standard diploma, students
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

enro lled in grades eight through twelve in the 2024-2025 school year
shall complete the following college preparatory/work ready
curriculum units or sets of competencies at the secondary level:
1. Four units or sets of competencies of English to include
Grammar, Composition, Literature, or any English course approved for
college admission requirements;
2. Three units or sets of competencies of mathematics, limited
to Algebra I, Algebra II, Geometry, Trigonometry, Math Analysis,
Calculus, Advanced Placement Statistics, or any mathematics course
with content and/or rigor above Algebra I and approved for college
admission requirements;
3. Three units or sets of competencies of laboratory science
approved for college admission requirements including one unit or
set of competencies of life science meeting the standards for
Biology I; one unit or set of competencies of physical science,
meeting the standards for Physical Science, Chemistry, or Physics;
and one unit or set of competencies from the domains of physical
science, life science, or earth and space science such that the
content and rigor is above Biology I or Physical Science;
4. Three units or sets of competencies of history and
citizenship skills, including one unit of American History, one-half
unit of Oklahoma History, one-half unit of United States Government,
and one unit from the subjects of History, Government, Geography,

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Econ omics, Civics, or non-Western culture and approved for college
admission requirements;
5. Two units or sets of competencies of the same world or non-
English language or two units of computer technology approved for
college admission requirements, whether taught at a high school or a
technology center school, including computer programming, hardware,
and business computer applications, such as word processing,
databases, spreadsheets, and graphics, excluding keyboarding or
typing courses;
6. One additional unit or set of competencies selected from
paragraphs 1 through 5 of this subsection or career and technology
education courses, concurrently enrolled courses, Advanced Placement
advanced placement courses, or International Baccalaureate courses
approved for college admission requirements;
7. One-half (1/2) unit or set of competencies of personal
financial literacy, as provided in the Passport to Financial
Literacy Act, whether taught as an elective course or when taught
during instruction as provided in and subject to the standards of
subsection A of Section 11-103.6h of this title in coursework
offered by the school district or partnering technology center
school by a teacher certified in a relevant secondary subject area
and taken in the tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grade; and
8. One unit or set of competencies of fine arts, such as music,
art, or drama, or one unit or set of competencies of speech.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. In lieu of the requirements of subsection B or D of this
section which requires a college preparatory/work ready curriculum,
a student enrolled in grades eight through twelve in the 2024-2025
school year may enroll in the core curriculum as provided in this
subsection D of this section upon written approval of the parent or
legal guardian of the student. For students under the age of
eighteen (18), school districts shall require a parent or legal
guardian of the student to meet with a designee of the school prior
to enrollment in the core curriculum. The State Department of
Education shall develop and distribute to school districts a form
suitable for this purpose, which shall include information on the
benefits to students of completing the college preparatory/work
ready curriculum as provided for in subsection B of this section.
D. For those students subject to the requirements of subsection
C of this section, in In order to graduate from a public high school
accredited by the State Board of Education with a standard diploma,
students enrolled in grades eight through twelve in the 2024-2025
school year shall complete the following core curriculum units or
sets of competencies at the secondary level:
1. Language Arts – Four units or sets of competencies, to
consist of one unit or set of competencies of grammar and
composition, and three units or sets of competencies which may
include, but are not limited to, the following courses:
a. American Literature,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. English Literature,
c. World Literature,
d. Advanced English Courses, or
e. other English courses with content and/or rigor equal
to or above grammar and composition;
2. Mathematics – Three units or sets of competencies to consist
of one unit or set of competencies of Algebra I or Algebra I taught
in a contextual methodology, and two units or sets of competencies
which may include, but are not limited to, the following courses:
a. Algebra II,
b. Geometry or Geometry taught in a contextual
methodology,
c. Trigonometry,
d. Math Analysis or Precalculus,
e. Calculus,
f. Statistics and/or Probability,
g. Computer Science or acceptance and successful
completion of one (1) year of a full-time, three-hour
career and technology program leading to an industry
credential/certificate or college credit. The State
Board of Career and Technology Education shall
promulgate rules to define the provisions of this
section related to the accepted industry-valued
credentials which are industry-endorsed or industry-
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

aligned. The list of accepted industry-valued
credentials shall be reviewed annually and updated at
least every three (3) years by the Board,
h. (1) contextual mathematics courses which enhance
technology preparation, or
(2) a science, technology, engineering, and math
(STEM) block course meeting the requirements for
course competencies listed in paragraph 2 of
subsection B of this section, whether taught at
a:
(a) comprehensive high school, or
(b) technology center school when taken in the
tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grade, taught by
a certified teacher, and approved by the
State Board of Education and the independent
school district board of education,
i. mathematics courses taught at a technology center
school by a teacher certified in the secondary subject
area when taken in the tenth, eleventh, or twelfth
grade upon approval of the State Board of Education
and the independent school district board of
education, or
j. any other mathematics course with content and/or rigor
equal to or above Algebra I;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

3. Science – Three units or sets of competencies to consist of
one unit or set of competencies of Biology I or Biology I taught in
a contextual methodology, and two units or sets of competencies in
the areas of life, physical, or earth science or technology which
may include, but are not limited to, the following courses:
a. Chemistry I,
b. Physics,
c. Biology II,
d. Chemistry II,
e. Physical Science,
f. Earth Science,
g. Botany,
h. Zoology,
i. Physiology,
j. Astronomy,
k. Applied Biology/Chemistry,
l. Applied Physics,
m. Principles of Technology,
n. qualified agricultural education courses,
o. (1) contextual science courses which enhance
technology preparation, or
(2) a science, technology, engineering, and math
(STEM) block course meeting the requirements for
course competencies listed in paragraph 3 of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

subsection B of this section, whether taught at
a:
(a) comprehensive high school, or
(b) technology center school when taken in the
tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grade, taught by
a certified teacher, and approved by the
State Board of Education and the independent
school district board of education,
p. science courses taught at a technology center school
by a teacher certified in the secondary subject area
when taken in the tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grade
upon approval of the State Board of Education and the
independent school district board of education, or
q. other science courses with content and/or rigor equal
to or above Biology I;
4. Social Studies – Three units or sets of competencies, to
consist of one unit or set of competencies of United States History,
one-half (1/2) to one unit or set of competencies of United States
Government, one-half (1/2) unit or set of competencies of Oklahoma
History, and one-half (1/2) to one unit or set of competencies which
may include, but are not limited to, the following courses:
a. World History,
b. Geography,
c. Economics,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

d. Anthropology, or
e. other social studies courses with content and/or rigor
equal to or above United States History, United States
Government, and Oklahoma History;
5. Arts – One unit or set of competencies which may include,
but is not limited to, courses in Visual Arts and General Music;
6. One-half (1/2) unit or set of competencies of personal
financial literacy, as provided in the Passport to Financial
Literacy Act, whether taught as an elective course or when taught
during instruction as provided in and subject to the standards of
subsection A of Section 11-103.6h of this title in coursework
offered by the school district or partnering technology center
school by a teacher certified in a relevant secondary subject area
and taken in the tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grade; and
7. Computer Education or World Language - One unit or set of
competencies of computer technology, whether taught at a high school
or a technology center school, including computer programming,
hardware, and business computer applications, such as word
processing, databases, spreadsheets, and graphics, excluding
keyboarding or typing courses, or one unit or set of competencies of
world or non-English language.
D. Beginning with the 2024-2025 school year, students whose
parent or legal guardian approved a modification of the existing
graduation track as outlined in subsections B and C of this section,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

subj ect to school approval, may complete a minimum of twenty-three
curriculum units or sets of competencies at the secondary level as
provided for in this subsection; and students entering the eighth
grade in the 2025-2026 school year, in order to graduate from a
public high school accredited by the State Board of Education with a
standard diploma, shall complete a minimum of the following twenty-
three curriculum units or sets of competencies at the secondary
level:
1. Four units or sets of competencies of English to include
Grammar, Composition, Literature, or any English course;
2. Four units or sets of competencies of mathematics, two of
which shall be Algebra I and either Algebra II or Geometry. The
remaining two units may include Algebra II, Geometry, Trigonometry,
Math Analysis, Calculus, Statistics, Math of Finance, Computer
Science, college courses approved for dual credit, an approved full-
time postsecondary career and technology program or a locally
approved math-based application course, or any mathematics course
with content and/or rigor above Algebra I;
3. Three units or sets of competencies of laboratory science
approved for college admission requirements including one unit or
set of competencies of life science meeting the standards for
Biology I; one unit or set of competencies of physical science
meeting the standards for Physical Science, Chemistry, or Physics;
and one unit or set of competencies from the domains of physical
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

scie nce, life science, or earth and space science, an approved full-
time postsecondary career and technology program or a locally
approved science-based application course, or any science course
with content and/or rigor above Biology I or Physical Science;
4. Three units or sets of competencies of history and
citizenship skills including one unit of American History, one-half
unit of Oklahoma History, one-half unit of United States Government,
and one unit from the subjects of History, Government, Geography,
Economics, Civics, or non-Western culture;
5. Six pathway units or sets of competencies approved at the
discretion of the school district board of education which align
with each student’s Individual Career and Academic Plan (ICAP) and
may include, but are not limited to, any additional units or sets of
competencies as provided in paragraphs 1 through 4 of this
subsection, world or non-English language, computer technology,
Junior Reserve Officers’ Training Corps (JROTC), internship or
apprenticeship programs, career and technology education courses,
concurrently enrolled courses, advanced placement courses,
International Baccalaureate courses approved for college admission
requirements, music, art, drama, speech, dance, media arts, or other
approved courses; and
6. Three units or sets of competencies of elective courses
approved by the school district board of education.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 14
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

E. A school district shall determine the specific description
of the locally approved math- and science-based application courses
allowed pursuant to paragraphs 2 and 3 of subsection D of this
section. Formal notification with the specific course description
shall be provided to the State Department of Education prior to July
1 of each school year. The notification shall include what courses
will be coded as locally approved math- and science-based
application courses for the ensuing school year.
F. A school district may issue an alternate diploma to a
student who meets the definition of a student with the most
significant cognitive disabilities and who participates in the
Oklahoma Alternate Assessment Program (OAAP) beginning in the 2023-
2024 school year. An alternate diploma shall be standards-based,
aligned with requirements for a standard diploma, and obtained by
the school year in which a student turns twenty-two (22) years of
age.
F. G. An alternate diploma shall not terminate a Free and
Appropriate Public Education (FAPE) for students with an
Individualized Education Program (IEP) unless they reach the maximum
age of FAPE. The IEP team shall determine subsequent courses and
services for students who receive an alternate diploma.
G. H. Students participating in the OAAP shall not be precluded
from attempting to meet the requirements of a standard diploma, and
participation in the OAAP shall not determine a student’s
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 15
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

educ ational setting under the Individuals with Disabilities
Education Act (IDEA).
H. I. Students who meet requirements for an alternate diploma
may count as having received a standard diploma for purposes of
calculating and reporting the adjusted cohort graduation rate (ACGR)
calculated pursuant to Section 3-151.1 of this title.
I. J. A student may be awarded an alternate diploma upon
completion of the following curriculum units or sets of competencies
at the secondary level:
1. Language Arts – Four units or sets of competencies based on
alternate academic achievement standards to consist of reading
literature, reading informational text, writing, speaking and
listening, and language in the following courses:
a. English 1 Alternate,
b. English 2 Alternate,
c. English 3 Alternate, and
d. English 4 Alternate;
2. Mathematics – Three Four units or sets of competencies based
on alternate academic achievement standards to consist of number,
quantities, algebra, functions/statistics, probability, and geometry
in the following courses:
a. Math Alternate 1,
b. Math Alternate 2, and
c. Math Alternate 3, and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 16
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

d. Math Alternate 4;
3. Science – Three units or sets of competencies based on
alternate academic achievement standards to consist of life science,
physical science, and earth science in the following courses:
a. Life Science Alternate,
b. Physical Science Alternate, and
c. Earth Science Alternate;
4. Social Studies – Three units or sets of competencies based
on alternate academic achievement standards to consist of United
States History, United States Government, Oklahoma History,
Geography, and Social Studies in the following courses:
a. Social Studies Alternate 1,
b. Social Studies Alternate 2, and
c. Social Studies Alternate 3;
5. Arts – One unit or set of competencies which may include,
but is not limited to, courses in Visual Arts and General Music;
6. Computer Education or World Language - One unit or set of
competencies of computer technology, whether taught at a high school
or a technology center school, including computer programming,
hardware, and business computer applications, such as word
processing, databases, spreadsheets, and graphics, excluding
keyboarding or typing courses, or one unit or set of competencies of
world or non-English language;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 17
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

7. Career Readiness – at least two units of Career Readiness,
including Career Readiness I, Career Readiness II, Career Readiness
III, or Career Readiness IV. Each Career Readiness course may be
substituted for Careers/Exploration, Internship I, or Internship II;
and
8. Life Skills – at least two units of Life Skills, such as
Life Skills I, Life Skills II, Life Skills III, or Life Skills IV.
Each Life Skills course may be substituted for the Life Skills or
Family and Consumer Science courses.
J. K. Courses in the core curriculum may be used as a
substitute for corresponding courses required by the alternate
diploma. Other courses may be substituted as determined by the
State Board of Education.
K. L. 1. In addition to the curriculum requirements of either
subsection B, C, or D of this section, in order to graduate from a
public high school accredited by the State Board of Education,
students shall complete any additional course requirements or
recommended elective courses as may be established by the State
Board of Education and the school district school board of
education. School districts shall strongly encourage students to
complete two units or sets of competencies of world languages and
two units or sets of competencies of physical and health education.


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 18
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. No student shall receive credit for high school graduation
more than once for completion of the same unit or set of
competencies to satisfy the curriculum requirements of this section.
3. A school district shall not be required to offer every
course listed in subsections B, C, and D of this section but shall
offer sufficient courses to allow a student to meet the graduation
requirements during the secondary grade years of the student.
L. M. 1. In addition to the curriculum requirements of either
subsection B, C, or D of this section, beginning with ninth graders
in the 2021-22 2021-2022 school year, in order to graduate from a
public high school accredited by the State Board of Education,
students shall pass the United States naturalization test pursuant
to the provisions of this subsection.
2. School districts shall offer the United States
naturalization test to students at least once per school year,
beginning as early as eighth grade at the discretion of the school
district; provided, any student may retake the exam upon request,
and as often as desired, until earning a passing score. For
purposes of this subsection, a passing score shall be 60 out of 100
questions.
3. School districts shall exempt students with disabilities
whose individualized education program (IEP) IEP, consistent with
state law, indicates that the student is to be assessed with
alternate achievement standards through the OAAP.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 19
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

M. N. For purposes of this section:
1. “Contextual methodology” means academic content and skills
taught by utilizing real-world problems and projects in a way that
helps students understand the application of that knowledge;
2. “Locally approved” means approved by the school district
board of education;
3. “Math-based application course” means a course that teaches
math content within a real-world application;
4. “Pathway unit” means a course taken by a high school student
that is aligned with the student’s current ICAP;
5. “Qualified agricultural education courses” means courses
that have been determined by the State Board of Education to offer
the sets of competencies for one or more science content areas and
which correspond to academic science courses. Qualified
agricultural education courses shall include, but are not limited
to, Horticulture horticulture, Plant plant and Soil Science soil
science, Natural Resources natural resources and Environmental
Science environmental science, and Animal Science animal science.
The courses shall be taught by teachers certified in agricultural
education and comply with all rules of the Oklahoma Department of
Career and Technology Education;
3. 6. “Rigor” means a level of difficulty that is thorough,
exhaustive and accurate and is appropriate for the grade level;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 20
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

7. “Science-based application course” means a course that
teaches science content within a real-world application;
4. 8. “Sets of competencies” means instruction in those skills
and competencies that are specified in the subject matter standards
adopted by the State Board of Education and other skills and
competencies adopted by the Board, without regard to specified
instructional time; and
5. 9. “Unit” means a Carnegie Unit as defined by the North
Central Association’s Commission on Schools.
N. O. 1. The State Board of Education, the State Board of
Career and Technology Education, and the Oklahoma State Regents for
Higher Education shall adopt a joint plan and electronically submit
it to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the
House of Representatives by January 1, 2025, to ensure that rigor is
maintained in the content, teaching methodology, level of
expectations for student achievement, and application of learning in
all the courses taught to meet the graduation requirements as
specified in subsection D of this section.
2. The State Board of Education shall allow as much flexibility
at the district level as is possible without diminishing the rigor
or undermining the intent of providing these courses. To accomplish
this purpose, the State Department of Education shall work with
school districts in reviewing and approving courses taught by
districts that are not specifically listed in subsections B, C, and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 21
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

D of this section. Options may include, but shall not be limited
to, courses taken by concurrent enrollment, advanced placement, or
correspondence, or courses bearing different titles.
3. The State Board of Education shall approve an advanced
placement computer science course to meet the requirements of course
competencies listed in paragraph 2 of subsection B of this section
if the course is taken in a student’s senior year and the student is
concurrently enrolled in or has successfully completed Algebra II.
4. Technology center school districts may offer programs
designed in cooperation with institutions of higher education which
have an emphasis on a focused field of career study upon approval of
the State Board of Education and the independent district board of
education. Students in the tenth grade may be allowed to attend
these programs for up to one-half (1/2) of a school day and credit
for the units or sets of competencies required in paragraphs 2, 3,
6, and 7 of subsection B or D C or paragraphs 2, 3, 5, and 6 of
subsection D of this section shall be given if the courses are
taught by a teacher certified in the secondary subject area;
provided, credit for units or sets of competencies pursuant to
subsection B and paragraphs 3 and 5 of subsection D of this section
shall be approved for college admission requirements as applicable.
5. 4. If a student enrolls in a concurrent enrollment course,
the school district shall not be responsible for any costs incurred
for that course, unless the school district does not offer enough
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 22
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

cour se selection during the student’s secondary grade years to allow
the student to receive the courses needed to meet the graduation
requirements of this section. If the school district does not offer
the necessary course selection during the student’s secondary grade
years, it shall be responsible for the cost of resident tuition at
an institution in The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education,
fees, and books for the concurrent enrollment course, and providing
for transportation to and from the institution to the school site.
It is the intent of the Legislature that for students enrolled
in a concurrent enrollment course which is paid for by the school
district pursuant to this paragraph, the institution charge only the
supplementary and special service fees that are directly related to
the concurrent enrollment course and enrollment procedures for that
student. It is further the intent of the Legislature that fees for
student activities and student service facilities, including the
student health care and cultural and recreational service fees, not
be charged to such students.
6. 5. Credit for the units or sets of competencies required in
subsection B, C, or D of this section shall be given when such units
or sets of competencies are taken prior to ninth grade if the
teachers are certified or authorized to teach the subjects for high
school credit and the required rigor is maintained.
7. 6. The three units or sets of competencies in mathematics
required in subsection B, C, or D of this section shall may be
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 23
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

comp leted in at any time during the ninth eighth through twelfth
grades. If a student completes any required courses or sets of
competencies in mathematics prior to ninth eighth grade, the student
may take any other mathematics courses or sets of competencies to
fulfill the requirement to complete three the units or sets of
competencies in grades nine eight through twelve after the student
has satisfied the requirements of subsection B, C, or D of this
section.
8. 7. The one-half (1/2) unit or set of competencies in
personal financial literacy required in subsection B or D C of this
section shall be completed in the tenth, eleventh, or twelfth grade
to fulfill the requirements for graduation.
9. 8. All units or sets of competencies required for graduation
may be taken in any sequence recommended by the school district.
O. P. As a condition of receiving accreditation from the State
Board of Education, all students in grades nine through twelve shall
enroll in a minimum of six periods, or the equivalent in block
scheduling or other scheduling structure that allows for instruction
in sets of competencies, of rigorous academic and/or rigorous
vocational courses each day, which may include arts, vocal and
instrumental music, speech classes, and physical education classes.
P. Q. 1. Academic and vocational-technical courses designed to
offer sets of competencies integrated or embedded within the courses
that provide for the teaching and learning of the appropriate skills
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 24
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

and knowledge in the subject matter standards, as adopted by the
State Board of Education, may, upon approval of the Board, in
consultation with the Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology
Education if the courses are offered at a technology center school
district, be counted for academic credit and toward meeting the
graduation requirements of this section.
2. Internet-based courses offered by a technology center school
that are taught by a certified teacher and provide for the teaching
and learning of the appropriate skills and knowledge in the subject
matter standards may, upon approval of the State Board of Education
and the independent school district board of education, be counted
for academic credit and toward meeting the graduation requirements
of this section.
3. Internet-based courses or vocational-technical courses
utilizing integrated or embedded skills for which no subject matter
standards have been adopted by the State Board of Education may be
approved by the Board, in consultation with the Oklahoma Department
of Career and Technology Education if the courses are offered at a
technology center school district, if such courses incorporate
standards of nationally recognized professional organizations and
are taught by certified teachers.
4. Courses offered by a supplemental education organization
that is accredited by a national accrediting body and that are
taught by a certified teacher and provide for the teaching and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 25
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

lear ning of the appropriate skills and knowledge in the subject
matter standards may, upon approval of the State Board of Education
and the school district board of education, be counted for academic
credit and toward meeting the graduation requirements of this
section.
Q. R. The State Board of Education shall provide an option for
high school graduation based upon attainment of the desired levels
of competencies as required in tests administered pursuant to the
provisions of Section 1210.508 of this title. Such option shall be
in lieu of the amount of course credits earned.
R. S. The State Board of Education shall prescribe, adopt, and
approve a promotion system based on the attainment by students of
specified levels of competencies in each area of the core
curriculum.
S. T. Children who have an IEP pursuant to the IDEA, and who
satisfy the graduation requirements through the individualized
education program IEP for that student shall be awarded a standard
diploma.
T. Students who enter the ninth grade in or prior to the 2007-
08 school year who are enrolled in an alternative education program
and meet the requirements of their plans leading to high school
graduation developed pursuant to Section 1210.568 of this title
shall be awarded a standard diploma.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 26
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

U. Any student who completes the curriculum requirements of the
International Baccalaureate Diploma Program shall be awarded a
standard diploma.
V. Any student who successfully completes an advanced
mathematics or science course offered pursuant to Section 1210.404
of this title shall be granted academic credit toward meeting the
graduation requirements pursuant to paragraph 2 or 3, as
appropriate, of subsection B, C, or D of this section.
W. For purposes of this section, the courses approved for
college admission requirements shall be courses which are approved
by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education for admission to
an institution within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education.
X. Students who have been denied a standard diploma by the
school district in which the student is or was enrolled for failing
to meet the requirements of this section may re-enroll in the school
district that denied the student a standard diploma following the
denial of a standard diploma. The student shall be provided
remediation or intervention and the opportunity to complete the
curriculum units or sets of competencies required by this section to
obtain a standard diploma. Students who re-enroll in the school
district to meet the graduation requirements of this section shall
be exempt from the hourly instructional requirements of Section 1-
111 of this title and the six-period enrollment requirements
requirement of this section.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 27
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Y. The State Department of Education shall collect and report
data by school site and district on the number of students who
enroll in the core curriculum as provided in subsection D of this
section.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 1210.508, as
last amended by Section 10, Chapter 492, O.S.L. 2025 (70 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1210.508), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1210.508. A. 1. By no later than December 31, 2016,
the State Board of Education shall adopt a statewide system of
student assessments in compliance with the Elementary and Secondary
Education Act of 1965 (ESEA), as reauthorized and amended by P.L.
No. 114-95, also known as the Every Student Succeeds Act (ESSA).
2. The statewide student assessment system adopted by the Board
pursuant to this subsection shall be aligned with the Oklahoma
Academic Standards as adopted by the Board and which prepare
students for college and careers.
B. 1. The Board shall issue a request for proposals for the
selection of assessments to be administered to students in grades
three through twelve as a part of the statewide student assessment
system adopted by the Board pursuant to this section.
2. The Board shall adopt assessments from the selected
proposals that were submitted pursuant to paragraph 1 of this
subsection. The adopted assessments shall be administered by the
Board for a period that is in coordination with the six-year subject
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 28
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

area textbook adoption cycle unless the vendor does not fulfill the
terms of the contract or fails to comply with or violates the terms
of the contract. The Board shall administer the assessments
beginning with the 2017-2018 school year.
C. The statewide student assessment system adopted by the Board
pursuant to this section shall include assessments that:
1. Are aligned with the Oklahoma subject matter standards as
adopted by the Board;
2. Provide a measure of comparability among other states;
3. Yield both norm-referenced scores and criterion-referenced
scores;
4. Have a track record of statistical reliability and accuracy;
and
5. For assessments administered in high school, provide a
measure of future academic performance.
D. For the 2016-2017 school year, the Board shall administer
assessments in:
1. English Language Arts or reading and mathematics in grades
three through eight and at least once in high school, during the
grade span of nine through twelve;
2. Science not less than once during each grade span of three
through five, six through nine, and ten through twelve; and
3. United States History not less than once during the grade
span of nine through twelve.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 29
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

E. 1. Beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, the statewide
student assessment system shall include assessments in:
a. English Language Arts and mathematics in grades three
through eight and at least once in high school, during
the grade span of nine through twelve,
b. science not less than once during each grade span of
three through five, six through nine, and ten through
twelve, and
c. United States History, with an emphasis on civics, not
less than once during the grade span of nine through
twelve.
2. Beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, the statewide
student assessment system may include:
a. assessments in reading, writing, and mathematics in
certain grades as determined by the Board, and
b. contingent upon the availability of funds, an
additional nationally recognized college- and career-
readiness assessment or assessments as recommended by
the State Department of Education, which will be
administered to students in high school at no cost to
the student.
F. 1. Beginning with students entering the ninth grade in the
2017-2018 school year, each student shall take the assessment or
assessments included in the statewide student assessment system
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 30
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

adop ted by the Board pursuant to subsection A of this section in
order to graduate from a public high school with a standard or
alternate diploma. All students shall take the assessment or
assessments prior to graduation, unless otherwise exempt by law.
2. Beginning with students entering the ninth grade in the
2017-2018 school year, each student, in addition to taking the
assessment or assessments included in the statewide student
assessment system adopted by the Board pursuant to subsection A of
this section, shall meet any other high school graduation
requirements adopted by the Board pursuant to Section 5 of Enrolled
House Bill No. 3218 of the 2nd Session of the 55th Oklahoma
Legislature in order to graduate from a public high school with a
standard or alternate diploma.
3. For students who start the ninth grade prior to or during
the 2016-2017 school year, school districts shall adopt a plan that
establishes the assessment or assessments those students are
required to take in order to graduate from a public high school with
a standard diploma. The plan may also include any or all of the
other high school graduation requirements adopted by the Board
pursuant to Section 5 of Enrolled House Bill No. 3218 of the 2nd
Session of the 55th Oklahoma Legislature that those students will be
required to meet in order to graduate from a public high school with
a standard diploma.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 31
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

4. The Board shall promulgate rules to ensure that students who
transfer into an Oklahoma a school district in this state from out-
of-state after the junior year of high school shall not be denied
the opportunity to be awarded a standard or alternate diploma due to
differing testing requirements.
G. In order to provide an indication of the levels of
competency attained by the student in a permanent record for
potential future employers and institutions of higher education,
school districts shall report on the high school transcript of the
student the highest-achieved score on the assessment or assessments
included in the statewide student assessment system adopted by the
Board pursuant to subsection A of this section and any business- and
industry-recognized endorsements attained.
H. Students who do not perform at a proficiency level on
assessments shall be remediated as established in the assessment
requirements adopted by the Board pursuant to Section 5 of Enrolled
House Bill No. 3218 of the 2nd Session of the 55th Oklahoma
Legislature, subject to the availability of funding.
I. 1. All assessments required by this section shall measure
academic competencies in correlation with the subject matter
standards adopted by the Board pursuant to Sections 11-103.6 and 11-
103.6a of this title and referred to as the Oklahoma Academic
Standards. The State Board of Education shall evaluate the subject
matter standards to ensure the competencies reflect high standards,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 32
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

are specific, well-defined, measurable, and challenging, and will
prepare elementary students for next-grade-level course work and
secondary students for postsecondary studies at institutions of
higher education or technology center schools without the need for
remediation. All subject matter standards shall reflect the goals
as set forth in Section 11-103.6 of this title and of improving the
state average of college entrance exam scores.
2. The State Department of Education shall annually evaluate
the results of the assessments. The State Board of Education shall
ensure that preliminary results for all statewide assessments are
reported to districts no later than June 20 of each year and are
presented in a manner that yields detailed, diagnostic information
for the purpose of guiding instruction and student remediation. As
improvements are made to the assessments required by this section,
the Board shall seek to increase the depth of knowledge assessed for
each subject. The State Board of Education shall seek to ensure
that data yielded from the assessments required in this section are
utilized at the school district level to inform instruction,
professional development, school improvement, and remediation for
students.
3. The Commission for Educational Quality and Accountability
shall determine the cut scores for the performance levels on all
statewide assessments. The Commission shall conduct an ongoing
review to compare the statewide assessment content and performance
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 33
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

desc riptors with those of other states. Upon receipt of the review,
the Commission may adjust the cut scores as necessary.
4. The State Board of Education, for the purposes of conducting
reliability and validity studies, monitoring contractor adherence to
professionally accepted testing standards, and providing
recommendations for testing program improvement, shall retain the
services of an established, independent agency or organization that
is nationally recognized for its technical expertise in educational
testing but is not engaged in the development of aptitude or
achievement tests for elementary or secondary level grades. These
national assessment experts shall annually conduct studies of the
reliability and validity of the statewide assessments administered
pursuant to this section. Validity studies shall include studies of
decision validity and concurrent validity.
J. 1. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules
setting the assessment window dates for each statewide assessment so
that the assessments are administered according to recommended
testing protocols and so that the assessment results are reported
back to school districts in a timely manner. The vendor shall
provide a final electronic data file of all school site, school
district, and state results to the State Department of Education and
the Office of Educational Quality and Accountability prior to August
20 of each year. The Department shall forward the final data files
for each school district and each school site in that district to
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 34
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the school district. The Board shall ensure the contract with the
vendor includes a provision that the vendor report assessment
results directly to the Office of Educational Quality and
Accountability at the same time it is they are reported to the
Board.
2. State, district, and site level results of all assessments
required in this section shall be disaggregated by gender, race,
ethnicity, disability status, migrant status, English proficiency,
and status as economically disadvantaged, except that such
disaggregation shall not be required in a case in which the number
of students in a category is insufficient to yield statistically
reliable information or the results would reveal personally
identifiable information about an individual student. Each school
site shall notify the student’s parents or legal guardians of the
school’s performance levels in the Oklahoma School Testing Program
as reported in the Oklahoma Educational Indicators Program at the
end of each school year.
K. The State Board of Education shall be responsible for the
field-testing and validation of the statewide assessment system
required in subsection A of this section.
L. The State Board of Education shall develop, administer, and
incorporate as a part of the Oklahoma School Testing Program other
assessment programs or procedures including appropriate
accommodations for the assessment of students with disabilities as
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 35
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

requ ired by the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA),
20 U.S.C., Section 1400 et seq.
M. For purposes of developing and administering alternate
assessments for students with the most significant cognitive
disabilities, the State Board of Education shall not be subject to
subsections D and E of Section 11-103.6a of this title.
N. By December 15, 2026, and annually thereafter, the State
Board of Education shall electronically submit a report to the
Legislature containing data collected for the most recently
completed school year on the number and demographics of students who
were eligible for advanced mathematics courses, the number and
demographics of students who were placed in advanced mathematics
courses, the number and demographics of students placed in
mathematics intervention courses, and the number and demographics of
students not placed in advanced mathematic courses or mathematic
intervention courses. The report shall include information on the
type and format of advanced mathematic courses and the type and
format of mathematic intervention courses.
O. The State Board of Education shall provide guidance on how
to best develop programming and courses to ensure all impacted
students receive rigorous, academically appropriate instruction in
mathematics.


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 36
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 3. REPEALER 70 O.S. 2021, Section 11-103.6, as
last amended by Section 166, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 11-103.6), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 4. REPEALER 70 O.S. 2021, Section 11-103.6, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 384, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 11-103.6), is hereby repealed.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION
March 3, 2026 - DO PASS












SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1497 SFLR Page 37
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)